Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 1
RELINQUISHMENT

19-5-100.2. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds that parental relinquishment and adoption of children are important and necessary options to facilitate the permanent placement of minor children if the birth parents are unable or unwilling to provide proper parental
care. The general assembly further finds that adoption offers significant psychological, legal, economic, and social benefits not only for children who might otherwise be homeless but also for parents who are unable to care for
their children and for adoptive parents who desire children to nurture, care for, and support. Conversely, the general assembly recognizes that disrupted adoptive placements often have a profound and negative impact on individuals,
particularly children, involved in the adoption proceedings.

It is the purpose of this article 5 to promote the integrity and finality of adoptions to ensure that children placed in adoptive placements will be raised in stable, loving, and permanent families. It is the further intent of the general assembly that
a prospective parent with a disability should not be denied the opportunity to provide a permanent adoptive placement for a child based solely on the parent's disability, as provided for in section 24-34-805 (2). The general assembly
intends that by enacting this legislation, it will be protecting children from being uprooted from adoptive placements and from the life-long emotional and psychological trauma that often accompanies being indiscriminately moved.

Source:

L. 94:
Entire section added, p. 746, § 1, effective April 20.

L. 2018:
(2) amended, (HB 18-1104), ch. 164, p. 1135, § 9, effective April 25.

19-5-100.5. Applicability of article.

Except where indicated otherwise, each provision of this article pertaining to relinquishment or adoption shall apply only to child welfare adoptions and not to private adoptions.

Source:

L. 2010:
Entire section added, (HB 10-1106), ch. 278, p. 1273, § 4, effective May 26.

19-5-101. Termination of the parent-child legal relationship.

The juvenile court may, upon petition, terminate the parent-child legal relationship between a parent or parents, or a possible parent or parents, and a child in:

Proceedings under section 19-1-104 (1)(d);

Proceedings under section 19-5-103.5 (2)(d);

Proceedings under section 19-5-105;

Proceedings under section 19-5-203 (1)(d), (1)(e), (1)(f), (1)(j), and (1)(k); or

Proceedings under section 19-5-105.5.

No parent shall relinquish the parent-child legal relationship with a child other than in accordance with the provisions of this article.

A termination by a court of a parent-child legal relationship pursuant to proceedings under this section or any section described by subsection (1) of this section shall not be deemed to terminate a sibling relationship between sibling children who are
parties to the termination of the parent-child legal relationship.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 801, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 99:
(1) amended, p. 1065, § 9, effective June 1.

L. 2007:
(1) amended, p. 113, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:
(3) added, p. 2, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2013:
(1)(b) and (1)(c) amended and (1)(d) added, (SB 13-227), ch. 353, p. 2057, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in § 19-4-101 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-5-102. Venue.

A petition for relinquishment of the parent-child relationship shall be filed in the county where the child resides or in the county where the petitioner resides. If a child placement agency is involved, the petition may be filed in the county where the
child placement agency is located.

A petition for termination of the parent-child legal relationship pursuant to section 19-5-105.5 or section 19-5-105.7 must be filed in the county where the child resides or in the county where the petitioner resides.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 801, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 88:
Entire section R&RE, p. 746, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 89:
Entire section amended, p. 938, § 1, effective March 21.

L. 2014:
Entire section amended, (HB 14-1162), ch. 167, p. 591, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-1-105 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-5-102.5. Relinquishment hearings - court docket priority.

On and after July 1, 2002, any hearing concerning a petition for relinquishment filed in a district court, the Colorado court of appeals, or the Colorado supreme court shall be given a priority on the court's docket. On and after July 1, 2002, if there
is no determination on a case concerning a petition for relinquishment by any such court within two months of the filing of the petition, it shall be given a priority on the court's docket that supersedes the priority of any other
priority civil hearing on the court's docket.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, nothing in this section shall affect the priority of a hearing concerning the issuance of a temporary protection order pursuant to section 13-14-104.5, C.R.S.

The provisions of this section shall be implemented within existing appropriations.

Source:

L. 2002:
Entire section added, p. 1644, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2003:
(2) amended, p. 1016, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 2004:
(2) amended, p. 556, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2013:
(2) amended, (HB 13-1259), ch. 218, p. 1016, § 21, effective July 1.

19-5-103. Relinquishment procedure - petition - hearings.

Any parent desiring to relinquish his or her child shall:

Obtain counseling for himself or herself and the child to be relinquished as the court deems appropriate from the county department of human or social services in the county where the parent resides or from a licensed child placement agency, and, if the
petitioner has not received the counseling required by the court, the petition must be continued until counseling is obtained, and the court shall refer the petitioner to counseling;

Petition the juvenile court upon a standardized form prescribed by the judicial department giving the following information: The name of both natural parents, if known; the name of the child, if named; the ages of all parties concerned; and the reasons
for which relinquishment is desired.

The petition shall be accompanied by a standardized affidavit of relinquishment counseling prescribed by the judicial department that includes:

A statement indicating the nature and extent of counseling furnished to the petitioner, if any, and the recommendations of the counselor;

A copy of the original birth certificate or a copy of the application therefor; and

A statement disclosing any and all payments, gifts, assistance, goods, or services received, promised, or offered to the relinquishing parent in connection with the pregnancy, birth, or proposed relinquishment of the child and the source or sources of
such payments, gifts, assistance, goods, or services.

(1.5) (a) Pursuant to the provisions of section 19-1-126, the petition for relinquishment shall:

Include a statement indicating whether the child is an Indian child; and

Include the identity of the Indian child's tribe, if the child is identified as an Indian child.

If notices were sent to the parent or Indian custodian of the child and to the Indian child's tribe, pursuant to section 19-1-126, the postal receipts shall be attached to the petition and filed with the court or filed within fourteen days after the filing
of the petition, as specified in section 19-1-126 (1)(c).

The counseling specified in subsection (1)(a) of this section and provided by the department or the child placement agency shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Information to the relinquishing parent concerning the permanence of the decision and the impact of such decision on the relinquishing parent now and in the future;

Information concerning each parent's complete medical and social histories;

In the case of pregnancy, referral of the woman for medical care and for determination of eligibility for medical assistance;

Information concerning alternatives to relinquishment and referral to private and public resources that may meet the parent's needs;

Relinquishment services necessary to protect the interests and welfare of a child born in a state institution;

Information to the child's parent that if he or she applies for public assistance for himself or herself and the child, he or she must cooperate with the child support enforcement unit for the establishment and enforcement of a child support order; and

The confidentiality of all information, except for nonidentifying information as defined in section 19-1-103 that may be accessed pursuant to part 4 of this article 19, obtained by the department and the child placement agency in the course of relinquishment
counseling unless the parent provides written permission or a release of information is ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction and except for a copy of an original birth certificate that may be obtained by an adult
adoptee, adult descendant of an adoptee, or a legal representative of the adoptee or descendant as authorized by section 19-5-305. The counseling must also include notice that a birth parent has the opportunity to file
a written statement specifying that the birth parent's information remain confidential, an explanation of the rights and responsibilities of birth parents who disagree about consent as set forth in section 19-5-305, and
notice that a birth parent has the opportunity to sign and submit a contact preference form and updated medical history statements to the state registrar as set forth in section 19-5-305 (1.5).

(2.5) In those cases in which a parent proposes to relinquish his or her parent-child legal relationship with respect to a child who is under one year of age pursuant to the expedited procedures set forth in section 19-5-103.5, the licensed child placement
agency or the county department of human or social services assisting the relinquishing parent shall proceed with filing the petition and providing notice as set forth in section 19-5-103.5.

Upon receipt of the petition for relinquishment, the court shall set the same for hearing on the condition that the requirements of subsection (1) of this section have been complied with by the petitioner.

Except as otherwise provided in section 19-5-103.5 (2)(d), the parent-child legal relationship of a parent shall not be terminated by relinquishment proceedings unless the parent joins in the petition.

The relinquishing parent, child placement agency, and county department of human or social services shall provide the court any and all information described in section 19-1-103 (103) that is available to the relinquishing parent, agency, or county department.

When a motion has been filed to terminate parental rights, a respondent parent with a pending dependency and neglect case brought pursuant to article 3 of this title 19 may pursue relinquishment pursuant to this article 5. Any relinquishment that occurs
pursuant to this article 5 must be certified into the dependency and neglect case. In any case where a respondent parent has relinquished the parent's rights pursuant to this article 5, the juvenile court shall follow the
procedures set forth in part 6 of article 3 of this title 19 to terminate any remaining respondent parent rights. When a motion has been filed to terminate parental rights pursuant to section 19-3-604, the caseworker shall,
upon request by a parent and if services are available, refer the requesting parent to relinquishment counseling. The county shall make reasonable attempts to refer relinquishment services that are accessible to the parent.

The court shall not issue an order of relinquishment until it is satisfied that the relinquishing parent and the child, if determined appropriate by the court, have been counseled pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and this subsection (5) and
fully advised of the consequences of the parent's act. The court may order counseling for any age child to be relinquished if the court deems such counseling would be in the child's best interests. The court may order that a child
younger than twelve years of age be prepared for relinquishment, termination of parental rights, or adoption.

If the court finds after the hearing that it is in the best interests of the child that no relinquishment be granted, the court shall enter an order dismissing the action.

The court shall enter an order of relinquishment if the court finds after the hearing that:

The relinquishing parent or parents and any child that the court directed into counseling have been counseled as provided in subsections (1) and (5) of this section; and

The parent's decision to relinquish is knowing and voluntary and not the result of any threats, coercion, or undue influence or inducements; and

The relinquishment would best serve the interests of the child to be relinquished.

There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a relinquishment would not be in the child's best interests if the child is twelve years of age or older and objects to the relinquishment.

If the court is not satisfied that the relinquishing parents and the child, if twelve years of age or older, have been offered proper and sufficient counsel and advice, it shall continue the matter for such time as the court deems necessary.

The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to protect the interests of the child if:

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (9)(a)(I) is effective until January 9, 2023.] The court finds that there is a conflict of interest between the child and his or her parents, guardian, or legal custodian;

(I)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (9)(a)(I) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
The court finds that there is a conflict of interest between the child and the child's parents, guardian, or legal custodian;

The court finds that such appointment would be in the best interests of the child; or

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (9)(a)(III) is effective until January 9, 2023.] The court determines that the child is twelve years of age or older and that the welfare of the child mandates such appointment.

(III)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (9)(a)(III) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
The court determines that the child is twelve years of age or older and that the welfare of the child mandates such appointment. If counsel for youth is appointed pursuant to article 3 of this
title 19, the counsel for youth is appointed pursuant to this section.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (9)(b) is effective until January 9, 2023.] Reasonable fees for guardians ad litem appointed pursuant to this subsection (9) shall be paid by the relinquishing parent or parents; except that, in the case of an
indigent parent or parents, such fees shall be paid as an expense of the state from annual appropriations to the office of the state court administrator.

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (9)(b) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
Reasonable fees for guardians ad litem or counsel for youth appointed pursuant to this subsection (9) must be paid by the relinquishing parent or parents; except that, in the case of an indigent parent
or parents, such fees must be paid as an expense of the state from annual appropriations to the office of the child's representative.

The court may interview the child in chambers to ascertain the child's wishes as to the relinquishment proceedings. The court may permit counsel to be present at such an interview. The court shall cause a record of the interview to be made, and it shall
be made a part of the record in the case.

The court may seek the advice of professional personnel whether or not said personnel are employed on a regular basis by the court. Any advice given by professional persons shall be in writing and shall be made available by the court to attorneys of record,
to the parties, and to any other expert witnesses upon request, but it shall be considered confidential for any other purposes, shall be sealed, and shall not be open to inspection except by consent of the court. Attorneys of record
may call for the cross-examination of any professional persons consulted by the court.

The provisions of this section, including but not limited to relinquishment counseling, notification, and the relinquishment hearing, shall apply in any case involving a child in Colorado or for whom Colorado is the home state as described in section
14-13-102 (7), C.R.S., including any case in which it is proposed that the child to be relinquished will be relinquished or adopted outside the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 801, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 92:
(1)(b)(II) amended, p. 179, § 1, effective March 20.

L. 97:
Entire section amended, p. 1155, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:
(2)(g) amended, p. 1373, § 6, effective July 1; (12) amended, p. 1538, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2002:
(1.5) added, p. 787, § 8, effective May 30.

L. 2003:
(2.5) added, p. 872, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2005:
(2)(g) amended, p. 992, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2007:
(4)(a) amended, p. 115, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2012:
(1.5)(b) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 875, § 135, effective July 1.

L. 2014:
(2)(g) amended, (SB 14-051), ch. 260, p. 1048, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2018:
(1)(a), (2.5), and (4)(b) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 424, § 65, effective August 8.

L. 2020:
(4)(c) added, (HB 20-1104), ch. 50, p. 175, § 2, effective September 14.

L. 2021:
IP(2), (2)(g), and (4)(b) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 734, § 83, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(9)(a)(I), (9)(a)(III), and (9)(b) amended, (HB 22-1038), ch. 92, p. 438, § 15, effective January 9, 2023.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in § 19-4-102 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act enacting subsection (1.5), see section 1 of chapter 217, Session Laws of Colorado 2002. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38,
Session Laws of Colorado 2018. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1038, see section 1 of chapter 92, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

19-5-103.5. Expedited relinquishment procedure - children under one year of age - other birth parents - notice - termination.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 19-5-103 to the contrary, a parent desiring to relinquish his or her child may seek an expedited order terminating his or her parent-child legal relationship without the necessity of a court hearing if:

The child is under one year of age, at the time of filing the petition;

The relinquishing parent is being assisted by a licensed child placement agency or the county department of human or social services in the county where such parent resides;

The requirements of section 19-5-103 (1) have been met; and

The parent signs an affidavit stating his or her desire to voluntarily relinquish his or her parent-child legal relationship with the child and consenting to a waiver of his or her right to contest a termination of parentage.

The affidavit required to be signed by the parent seeking to relinquish his or her parental rights pursuant to this section must advise the relinquishing parent of the consequences of the relinquishment decision and must further advise the relinquishing
parent that he or she is still required to obtain the relinquishment counseling described in section 19-5-103 (1)(a) and (2). The relinquishing parent must be advised of the opportunity to seek independent counseling.
The affidavit must also advise the relinquishing parent that he or she may withdraw the affidavit anytime after signing it but before the affidavit and petition are filed with the court. The relinquishing parent
may sign the affidavit before the birth of the child. The relinquishing birth parent may withdraw the affidavit from the child placement agency or county department of human or social services in the county where
the parent resides any time after signing it but before the affidavit and petition are filed with the court.

The affidavit shall include the following:

A statement that the petitioner has completed the relinquishment counseling required in section 19-5-103 (1) and (2) or understands he or she must complete the counseling prior to entry of the order of termination;

A statement that the child to be relinquished is under one year of age at the time of filing the petition;

A statement that the relinquishing parent's decision is knowing and voluntary and not the result of threats, coercion, or undue influence or inducements; and

A statement that the relinquishing parent believes the relinquishment is in the best interests of the child.

The relinquishing parent's signature on the affidavit must be witnessed by two witnesses, one of whom is either a representative of the licensed child placement agency with which the relinquishing parent has contracted or a representative of the county
department of human or social services in the county where the parent resides, whichever is assisting the parent. The other witness must not be associated with either the licensed child placement agency or the county
department of human or social services in the county where the parent resides, whichever is assisting the parent, and must not be the potential adoptive parent of the child to be relinquished.

The affidavit shall be notarized and shall be attached to the petition for relinquishment and filed with the court after the birth of the child. The petition for relinquishment may not be filed until at least four days after the birth of the child.

If the birth parent has signed the affidavit described in this subsection (1) and if it is properly witnessed and notarized and attached to the petition, the court may vacate the hearing required pursuant to section 19-5-103 (3) and, upon making the findings
set forth in section 19-5-103 (7)(a), shall enter an order of relinquishment, without a hearing, no more than seven business days after the date of the filing of the petition for relinquishment and the accompanying affidavit.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 19-5-105 to the contrary, in those cases in which a parent seeks to relinquish his or her parent-child legal relationship with a child pursuant to this section, the licensed child placement agency or the county
department of human or social services assisting the relinquishing parent shall proceed with filing the petition for termination of the other birth parent's or possible birth parents' parent-child legal relationship and
notify pursuant to this section the other birth parent or possible birth parents identified pursuant to section 19-5-105 (2).

Notice of the proceeding pursuant to this section shall be given to every person identified as the other birth parent or a possible birth parent in the manner appropriate under the Colorado rules of juvenile procedure for the service of process or in
any manner the court directs; except that notice shall not be required to be given to a person who has received notice pursuant to section 19-5-103.7 if the person waives the right to contest a termination of parental rights
and waives the right to further notice concerning the expedited relinquishment or if the person fails to reply as required pursuant to section 19-5-103.7. The notice shall inform the parent or alleged parent whose rights
are to be determined that failure to file an answer or to appear within twenty-one days after service and, in the case of an alleged father, failure to file a claim of paternity under article 4 of this title within twenty-one
days after service, if a claim has not previously been filed, may likely result in termination of the parent's or the alleged parent's parental rights to the child. The notice shall also inform the parent or alleged parent
whose rights are to be determined that the person has the right to waive his or her right to appear and contest and that failure to appear and contest may likely result in termination of the parent's or the alleged parent's
parental rights to the child. Proof of giving the notice shall be filed with the court before the petition is heard or otherwise acted upon. If no person has been identified as the birth parent, the court shall order that
notice be provided to all possible birth parents by publication or public posting of the notice at times and in the places and manner the court deems appropriate.

The other birth parent or possible birth parents may sign the affidavit of voluntary relinquishment described in subsection (1) of this section. Such birth parent may sign the affidavit prior to the birth of the child. If the other birth parent or possible
birth parent signs an affidavit of voluntary relinquishment, he or she may withdraw the affidavit from the child placement agency or the county department of human or social services assisting the relinquishing parent any
time after signing it but before the affidavit and petition are filed with the court.

The court shall vacate the proceeding and, at the time of the review of the case pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section, enter an order terminating the parent-child legal relationship of the other birth parent or possible birth parent
if the other birth parent or possible birth parent:

Has waived his or her right to contest the termination of parental rights; or

Has failed to appear and contest or to file an answer to the petition for termination or to file a paternity action within the prescribed twenty-one days following the date of the service, publication, or posting of the notice as provided in the notice
pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (2); or

Has signed the affidavit of voluntary relinquishment described in subsection (1) of this section; or

Has waived his or her right to notice and right to contest the termination of parental rights pursuant to section 19-5-103.7.

If the provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (d) do not apply and the other birth parent or possible birth parent expresses his or her desire to appear and contest the termination of the parent-child legal relationship, the court shall proceed
with a hearing on the petition for termination of the other birth parent's parent-child legal relationship.

The licensed child placement agency or the county department of human or social services assisting the relinquishing parent shall not submit the documents referenced in subsections (1) and (2) of this section for judicial review unless a permanent placement
for the child has been identified.

The court shall not be bound to enter an order terminating a parent-child legal relationship upon the affidavit of the relinquishing parent pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and the court shall not be bound to enter an order terminating a parent-child
legal relationship of the other birth parent or possible birth parents pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, but the court may, upon its own motion, require that a formal hearing be held to determine any or all issues presented
by the pleadings.

Source:

L. 2003:
Entire section added, p. 869, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:
(2)(a) amended, p. 263, § 1, effective April 5.

L. 2005:
(2)(b) and (2)(d) amended, p. 101, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2007:
(2)(a) and (2)(d)(II) amended, p. 114, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2012:
(2)(b) and (2)(d)(I)(B) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 875, § 136, effective July 1.

L. 2018:
(1)(a)(II), (1)(b)(I), (1)(b)(III), (2)(a), (2)(c), and (3) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 425, § 66, effective August 8.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.